Mississippi statutes. Title 43. Public Welfare
Article 7. Financial Assistance to State Agencies
[Repealed].

§§ 43-41-701 through 43-41-721.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 337, eff from and after July 1, 1984.

§43-41-701. [Laws, 1980, ch. 447, § 1]

§43-41-703. [Laws, 1980, ch. 447, § 2]

§43-41-705. [Laws, 1980, ch. 447, § 3]

§43-41-707. [Laws, 1980, ch. 447, § 4]

§43-41-709. [Laws, 1980, ch. 447, § 5]

§43-41-711. [Laws, 1980, ch. 447, § 6]

§43-41-713. [Laws, 1980, ch. 447, § 7]

§43-41-715. [Laws, 1980, ch. 447, § 8]

§43-41-717. [Laws, 1980, ch. 447, § 9]

§43-41-719. [Laws, 1980, ch. 447, § 10]

§43-41-721. [Laws, 1980, ch. 447, § 11]